Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

Definitions

6-1-101. Charter definitions.

As used in chapters 1-4 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the mayor and the aldermen;

“Department head” means the city administrator, city recorder, treasurer, police chief and any other department heads appointed by the board or mayor;

“Officer” means the mayor, aldermen, city attorney and city judge;

“This charter” refers to chapters 1-4 of this title; and

“Ward” means a geographical subdivision of the municipality established for the purpose of securing representation on the board.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1992, ch. 612, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1 of this chapter, §§ 6-1-101 — 6-1-103 (Acts 1957, ch. 40, §§ 1, 2; 1959, ch. 232, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-117, 6-133, 6-134), concerning mayor—aldermanic charters, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Electronic signatures on petitions for municipal formation and annexation. OAG 12-80, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (8/2/12).

6-1-102. Use of “shall” and “may.”

As used in this chapter, “shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1 of this chapter, §§ 6-1-101 — 6-1-103 (Acts 1957, ch. 40, §§ 1, 2; 1959, ch. 232, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-117, 6-133, 6-134), concerning mayor—aldermanic charters, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.